Utah statutes.
13-49-302.   Accounting for services -- Receipts.

(1)  An immigration consultant shall provide a signed receipt to a client for each payment made by that client.  The receipt shall be typed or computer generated on the immigration consultant's letterhead.

(2)  An immigration consultant shall make a statement of accounting for the services rendered and payments made:

(a)  in the client's native language;

(b)  to the client every two months;

(c)  that is typed or computer generated on the immigration consultant's letterhead;

(d)  that lists the individual charges and total charges for services; and

(e)  that lists the payments made by the client.

